Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 53
COLORADO MESA UNIVERSITY

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 27 of chapter 124, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 2003, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 2003, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

23-53-101. University established - role and mission.

There is hereby established a university at Grand Junction, to be known as Colorado Mesa university, which shall be a general baccalaureate and graduate institution with selective admission standards. Colorado Mesa university shall offer liberal arts and sciences, professional, and technical degree programs and a limited number of graduate programs. Colorado Mesa university shall also maintain a community college role and mission, including career and technical education programs. Colorado Mesa university shall receive resident credit for two-year course offerings in its commission-approved service area. Colorado Mesa university shall also serve as a regional education provider.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 780, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-079), ch. 153, p. 528, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1359, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1324), ch. 192, p. 768, § 1, effective May 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-53-101 as it existed prior to 2003.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

23-53-102. Board of trustees - creation - members - powers - duties.

There is established the board of trustees for Colorado Mesa university, referred to in this article 53 as the "board of trustees", which consists of thirteen members and is the governing authority for Colorado Mesa university. The board of trustees is, and is declared to be, a body corporate and, as such and by the names designated in this section, may:

Acquire and hold property for the use of Colorado Mesa university;

Be a party to all suits and contracts; and

Do all things necessary to carry out the provisions of this article in like manner as municipal corporations of this state, including but not limited to the power to demand, receive, hold, and use for the best interests of Colorado Mesa university such money, lands, or other property as may be donated or devised to or for the university.

The board of trustees and its successors shall have perpetual succession, shall have a seal, may make bylaws and regulations for the well-ordering and governance of Colorado Mesa university, and may conduct the business of the university in a manner not repugnant to the constitution and laws of this state. The board of trustees shall elect from the appointed members a chairperson, whose duties and responsibilities shall be prescribed in the duly adopted bylaws of the board of trustees. The board of trustees shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer, who may be members of the board and whose duties and responsibilities shall be prescribed in the duly adopted bylaws of the board of trustees. The staff of Colorado Mesa university shall provide staff support for the board of trustees.

The governor shall appoint, with the consent of the senate, eleven members of the board of trustees. Members appointed to the board of trustees have the authority to act on behalf of the board of trustees prior to obtaining confirmation by the senate. Of the eleven members appointed by the governor:

No more than six members may be affiliated with the same political party; and

At least two shall reside in Delta, Garfield, Mesa, or Montrose county.

The term of office for each member appointed by the governor is up to four years, expiring on December 31 of the third calendar year following the calendar year in which the member was appointed; except that terms shall be staggered so that no more than three appointed members' terms expire in the same calendar year. Each member shall hold office for the term for which the member has been appointed and until the member's successor is appointed and confirmed by the senate.

The twelfth member of the board of trustees shall be a full-time junior or senior student at Colorado Mesa university, elected by the members of the student body of Colorado Mesa university. The term of the student member is one year, beginning on July 1 each year. The student member is advisory, without the right to vote and without the right to attend executive sessions of the board of trustees, as provided by section 24-6-402. The student member must have resided in the state of Colorado for not less than three years prior to the student's election.

The thirteenth member shall be a member of the faculty of Colorado Mesa university elected by other members of the faculty for a term of two years, beginning on July 1 of every odd-numbered year. The faculty member is advisory, without the right to vote and without the right to attend executive sessions of the board of trustees, as provided by section 24-6-402.

A vacancy of an appointed member of the board of trustees shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired term. A vacancy of either of the elected members of the board of trustees shall be filled by election for the unexpired term. Each member of the board of trustees shall take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (6), the powers, duties, and functions formerly performed by the trustees of the state colleges in Colorado with respect to Mesa state college are hereby transferred to the board of trustees. Policies, resolutions, procedures, and agreements previously approved by the trustees of the state colleges in Colorado and applicable to Mesa state college shall remain in force and effect unless and until changed by the board of trustees.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (6), the powers, duties, and functions formerly performed by the board of trustees of Mesa state college are hereby transferred to the board of trustees of Colorado Mesa university. Policies, resolutions, procedures, and agreements previously approved by the board of trustees of Mesa state college shall remain in force and effect unless and until changed by the board of trustees of Colorado Mesa university.

In addition to those powers conferred elsewhere in this article, the board of trustees has the power to:

Appoint a president of Colorado Mesa university;

Appoint such other executive officers of the university as may be required;

Appoint faculty and employees as may be required;

Determine the compensation to be paid to the president, executive officers, faculty, and professional staff;

With the advice of the faculty, prescribe the degree programs for the university; and

Prescribe the student admissions qualifications.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 780, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 1232, § 6, effective May 26.

L. 2008:

(1)(b) amended, p. 340, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1359, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

IP(1)(a), (2), (3), and (4) amended, (HB 12-1324), ch. 192, p. 768, § 2, effective May 21.

L. 2018:

(5) amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 695, § 15, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

IP(1)(a), (2), (3), and (4) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 39, § 49, effective February 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2011. For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

23-53-102.5. Tuition - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1844, § 15, effective June 9.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1361, § 4, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2016. (See L. 2010, p. 1844.)

23-53-103. Board of trustees for the Colorado Mesa university fund - creation - control - use.

There is created in the state treasury the board of trustees for Colorado Mesa university fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", which shall be under the control of and administered by the board of trustees in accordance with the provisions of this article. The board of trustees shall have authority and responsibility for all moneys of the board of trustees and of Colorado Mesa university. The board of trustees shall designate, pursuant to its statutory authority, those moneys received or acquired by the board of trustees or by Colorado Mesa university, whether received by appropriation, grant, contract, or gift or by sale or lease of surplus real or personal property or by any other means, whose disposition is not otherwise provided for by law, that shall be credited to the fund. All interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. The moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the board of trustees and shall remain in the fund under the control of the board of trustees and shall not be transferred or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of a fiscal year.

The moneys in the fund shall remain under the control of the board of trustees and shall be used for the payment of salaries and operating expenses of the board of trustees and of Colorado Mesa university and for the payment of any other expenses incurred by the board of trustees in carrying out its powers and duties.

Moneys in the fund that are not needed for use by the board of trustees may be invested by the state treasurer in investments authorized by sections 24-36-109, 24-36-112, and 24-36-113, C.R.S. The board of trustees shall determine the amount of moneys in the fund that may be invested and shall notify the state treasurer in writing of the amount.

If the board of trustees votes to invest Colorado Mesa university assets pursuant to sections 23-53-103.3 and 23-53-103.4, the board shall establish an investment advisory committee consisting of at least five members to make recommendations to the board regarding investments. The investment advisory committee, at a minimum, shall include the Colorado Mesa university treasurer, a member of the board, and three representatives from the financial community.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 782, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended and (4) added, p. 340, § 2, effective April 10.

L. 2011:

(1), (2), and (4) amended and (5) added, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1361, § 5, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (5), effective July 1, 2012. (See L. 2011, p. 1361.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending subsections (1), (2), and (4) and adding subsection (5), see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

23-53-103.3. Investments in consolidated funds.

Unless otherwise restrained by the terms of a will, trust agreement, or other instrument of gift, the board of trustees is authorized to hold investments in one or more consolidated investment funds in which the participating trusts or accounts have undivided interests.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 341, § 3, effective April 10.

23-53-103.4. Corporate stock in name of nominee authorized.

In order to facilitate the investment, reinvestment, sale, and disposition of corporate stocks, the board of trustees is authorized to hold certificates of stock in the name of a nominee of its selection without disclosing the fact that the certificates are held by the board of trustees or are held in a fiduciary capacity if:

The records of the board and all reports or accounts rendered by it clearly show the ownership of the stock by the board and the facts regarding the board's holding; and

The nominee deposits with the board a signed statement showing the trust ownership, endorses the stock certificate in blank, and does not have possession of or access to the stock certificate except under the immediate supervision of the treasurer of Colorado Mesa university or another person that the board of trustees has designated.

The board of trustees shall maintain a list of certificates of stock held in the names of nominees pursuant to this section and shall make the list available for public inspection during normal business hours.

The board of trustees shall report to the joint budget committee of the general assembly at each regular session regarding the investments made and the earnings or losses derived therefrom under the provisions of this section and section 23-53-103.3. The report shall include information indicating the extent to which the investment managers hired by the board of trustees have achieved or failed to achieve the performance benchmarks established pursuant to section 23-53-103.6 (1)(b).

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 341, § 3, effective April 10.

L. 2011:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1362, § 6, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending subsection (1)(b), see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

23-53-103.6. Investment policy - fiduciary responsibility.

If the board of trustees votes to invest Colorado Mesa university's assets pursuant to sections 23-53-103.3 and 23-53-103.4, then the board of trustees shall develop and annually review a written investment policy for Colorado Mesa university, which policy shall include:

An acknowledgment by the board of trustees of the board's fiduciary responsibility with respect to oversight of the investment policy of Colorado Mesa university; and

The establishment of performance benchmarks for each investment manager hired by the board of trustees pursuant to sections 23-53-103.3 and 23-53-103.4.

In selecting investment managers for the purposes of this section, the board of trustees shall use an open and competitive process.

If the board of trustees votes to invest moneys pursuant to sections 23-53-103.3 and 23-53-103.4, the board shall require annual financial statements to be submitted to the board of trustees, the state treasurer, the state auditor, and the joint budget committee of the general assembly. The financial statements shall include, at a minimum, information concerning investment income, gains, and losses, if any, of Colorado Mesa university. The financial statements shall report the performance of investments on both a gross-of-fee and a net-of-fee basis.

If the board of trustees votes to invest moneys pursuant to sections 23-53-103.3 and 23-53-103.4, the board shall ensure that, at all times, liquid investment assets remain at a level sufficient to pay for all budgeted, outstanding operational obligations and expenses occurring within the current fiscal year.

Colorado Mesa university shall not request from the general assembly any general fund appropriations to replace any losses incurred due to investment activities conducted by the board of trustees pursuant to sections 23-53-103.3 and 23-53-103.4.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 342, § 3, effective April 10.

L. 2011:

IP(1), (1)(a), (3), and (5) amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1363, § 7, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending the introductory portion to subsection (1) and subsections (1)(a), (3), and (5), see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

23-53-104. Board of trustees for Colorado Mesa university to supervise.

The board of trustees shall have general supervision of Colorado Mesa university and the control and direction of the funds and appropriations made thereto, and the board of trustees shall have power to receive, demand, and hold for the uses and purposes of the university all money, lands, and other property which may be donated, devised, or conveyed thereto and to apply the same in such manner as shall best serve the university's objects and interests.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 783, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1363, § 8, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-53-106 as it existed prior to 2003.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

23-53-105. Power to acquire land.

The board of trustees shall also have power to take and hold, by gift, devise, or purchase or through exercise of the power of eminent domain pursuant to law, so much additional land as may become necessary for the location and construction of such additional buildings, structures, and other facilities as may be required for the uses and purposes of Colorado Mesa university from funds appropriated by the general assembly.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 783, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1363, § 9, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-53-107 as it existed prior to 2003.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

23-53-106. Board of trustees empowered to lease grounds.

For the purpose of providing dormitories, living and dining halls, or cottages and equipment for the use of Colorado Mesa university, and to enable the construction, financing, and ultimate acquisition thereof, and to aid in improving undeveloped portions of the grounds of Colorado Mesa university, the board of trustees is empowered to lease grounds under its control to private persons or corporations for a term not exceeding fifty years, subject to regulations as the board may prescribe and upon the condition that private persons or corporations shall construct and equip on the leased grounds buildings or improvements as the board of trustees designates or approves, reimbursement for money invested therein to be secured from the rentals of the buildings or from their sale to the board of trustees acting for the state.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 783, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1364, § 10, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-53-108 as it existed prior to 2003.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

23-53-107. No authority to obligate state.

Nothing in this article shall constitute authority to enter into a contract which in any way creates any debt or obligation upon the state on account of the construction of buildings or improvements; but buildings and improvements erected on lands under the control of the board of trustees and devoted to the uses of Colorado Mesa university under the terms of this article and the leasehold interest shall be exempt from taxation so far as permitted by the state constitution.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 783, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1364, § 11, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-53-109 as it existed prior to 2003.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

23-53-108. Buildings - control of.

The management of buildings erected and equipped under the terms of this article and the scale of rentals thereof shall be subject to the approval of the board of trustees.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 784, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-53-110 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-53-109. Board of trustees may rent buildings.

The board of trustees is authorized to lease or rent buildings constructed under the provisions of this article from the private persons or corporations constructing the buildings upon such terms as the board deems satisfactory as to current rental, maintenance, and ultimate purchase, paying therefor out of the revenues derived from the operation of the buildings by the board of trustees or from other funds under its control available for general maintenance purposes.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 784, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-53-111 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-53-110. To be state property at lease end.

Upon the termination of a lease or contract executed under the terms of this article providing for the construction and equipment of buildings, the buildings shall become the property of the state, together with all equipment, furnishings, or appurtenances therein contained or thereto attached; except that personal goods or effects of an occupant may be removed.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 784, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-53-112 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-53-111. Leasehold interest may be sold.

Nothing in this article shall prevent the transfer or sale of the leasehold interests prior to their expiration, subject to the approval of the board of trustees.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 784, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-53-113 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-53-112. Board of trustees may rent rooms.

Upon the termination of a lease or contract executed with private persons or corporations for the construction of buildings under the terms of this article, the board of trustees is empowered to rent rooms or quarters in buildings erected under leases or contracts for reasonable compensation as the board deems best in relation to current operation, maintenance, and upkeep costs.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 784, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-53-114 as it existed prior to 2003.